Hawaii statutes.
[§634J-5] Dismissal on failure to post
security. When security that has been ordered is not furnished, the
litigation shall be dismissed with prejudice as to the defendant for whose
benefit it was ordered. [L 1993, c 124, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next